Utah statutes.
4-31-13.   Stockyards -- Disinfection.
All stockyards are considered infectious, and all swine and other livestock,
except those for immediate slaughter, shall be unloaded in chutes in a section
of the yards that is cleaned and disinfected in accordance with departmental
rules.
